Ohio, session 136, HB721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 122.381 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 122.381. (A) The veterans organization grant program is created in the department of development. Under the program, the director of development, upon request from an organization eligible to receive money under division (B) of section 307.66 of the Revised Code, may annually provide a one thousand dollar grant to the organization for the purpose of financing celebrations honoring veterans or for providing veterans with basic necessities, including food. (B) The director of development shall establish the procedures by which eligible organizations may apply for assistance under this section and shall adopt rules for the administration of this section in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The rules shall require that each organization that receives a grant shall, until the funds have been exhausted, annually file a sworn statement with the director of development accounting for the complete expenditures of the funds. Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 3. 1 2 3 4 5 A DEV DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENT B General Revenue Fund C GRF 195460 Veterans Organization Grants $225,000 $225,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $225,000 $225,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $225,000 $225,000 VETERANS ORGANIZATION GRANTS The foregoing appropriation item 195460, Veterans Organization Grants, shall be used to issue grants to qualifying veterans organizations under Section 122.381 of the Revised Code. Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.